Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1157.
do enact as follows:SB1157,15Section 1. 11.0204 (1) (a) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1157,2,2611.0204 (1) (a) 3. The occupation, if any, and the name and address of the 7principal place of employment, if any, of each individual contributor whose 1cumulative contributions to the candidate committee for the calendar year are in 2excess of $200 $100.SB1157,23Section 2. 11.0304 (1) (a) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1157,2,7411.0304 (1) (a) 3. The occupation, if any, and the name and address of the 5principal place of employment, if any, of each individual contributor whose 6cumulative contributions to the political party for the calendar year are in excess of 7$200 $100.SB1157,38Section 3. 11.0404 (1) (a) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1157,2,12911.0404 (1) (a) 3. The occupation, if any, and the name and address of the 10principal place of employment, if any, of each individual contributor whose 11cumulative contributions to the legislative campaign committee for the calendar 12year are in excess of $200 $100.SB1157,413Section 4. 11.0504 (1) (a) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1157,2,171411.0504 (1) (a) 3. The occupation, if any, and the name and address of the 15principal place of employment, if any, of each individual contributor whose 16cumulative contributions to the political action committee for the calendar year are 17in excess of $200 $100.SB1157,518Section 5. 11.0604 (1) (a) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1157,2,221911.0604 (1) (a) 3. The occupation, if any, and the name and address of the 20principal place of employment, if any, of each individual contributor whose 21cumulative contributions to the independent expenditure committee for the 22calendar year are in excess of $200 $100.SB1157,623Section 6. 11.0704 (1) (b) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1157,3,4111.0704 (1) (b) 2. The occupation, if any, and the name and address of the 2principal place of employment, if any, of each individual contributor whose 3cumulative contributions to the recipient for the calendar year are in excess of $200 4$100.SB1157,75Section 7. 11.0804 (1) (a) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1157,3,9611.0804 (1) (a) 2. The occupation, if any, and the name and address of the 7principal place of employment, if any, of each individual contributor whose 8cumulative contributions to the referendum committee for the calendar year are in 9excess of $200 $100.SB1157,810Section 8. 11.0904 (1) (a) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1157,3,141111.0904 (1) (a) 3. The occupation, if any, and the name and address of the 12principal place of employment, if any, of each individual contributor whose 13cumulative contributions to the recall committee for the calendar year are in excess 14of $200 $100.SB1157,3,1515